Maine, session 132, LD1372.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §11117 is enacted to read:
§11117. Special Committee on Regulatory Review
1. Review of routine technical rules. Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 375
to the contrary, routine technical rules as described in section 8071, subsection 2 proposed
for adoption or amendment under chapter 375, subchapter 2-A are subject to review by the
Special Committee on Regulatory Review, established in this section for the purpose of
reviewing routine technical rules, referred to in this section as "the committee."
2. Committee membership; chairs. The committee consists of 6 members of the
Senate and 6 members of the House of Representatives, and the membership must be
evenly divided between each of the 2 parties holding the largest number of seats in each
chamber. The appointment of members and the selection of chairs are established by joint
rule of the Legislature.
3. Annual report. Beginning in 2028, the committee shall submit a report to the
Legislature listing the routine technical rules as described in section 8071, subsection 2,
sorted by agency, that were reviewed in the preceding calendar year and the action taken
by the committee on each reviewed rule. The report may also include the following:
A. Recommended legislation proposing changes to the process for the adoption of
routine technical rules; and
B. Recommendations for more effective collaboration among the Legislature, the
executive branch and the judicial branch with regard to adoption, enforcement and
adjudication of routine technical rules.
Sec. 2. Committee to adopt review procedure, recommend legislation. The
Special Committee on Regulatory Review, referred to in this section as "the committee"
and established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 11117, shall establish a
process for the committee to review routine technical rules as described in Title 5, section
8071, subsection 2 proposed for adoption or amendment pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A. At a minimum, the process must allow for the committee to review
proposed routine technical rules for necessity, efficiency and a benefit of the rule to the
public and for the committee to approve that a rule be adopted with or without change or
to reject adoption of the rule. No later than February 1, 2026, the committee shall submit
legislation to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature proposing to amend
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A as necessary to conform the statutory authority for the
adoption of routine technical rules with the review process established by the committee
pursuant to this section and to incorporate that review process into law.